Illinois, session 104th, HB2410.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Animal Welfare Act is amended by changing 5Section 3.6 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 605/3.6)7    Sec. 3.6. Acceptance of stray dogs and cats.8    (a) No animal shelter may accept a stray dog or cat unless 9the animal is reported by the shelter to the animal control or 10law enforcement of the county in which the animal is found by 11the next business day. An animal shelter may accept animals 12from: (1) the owner of the animal where the owner signs a 13relinquishment form which states he or she is the owner of the 14animal; (2) an animal shelter licensed under this Act; or (3) 15an out-of-state animal control facility, rescue group, or 16animal shelter that is duly licensed in their state or is a 17not-for-profit organization.18    (b) When stray dogs and cats are accepted by an animal 19shelter, they must be scanned for the presence of a microchip 20and examined for other currently-acceptable methods of 21identification, including, but not limited to, identification 22tags, tattoos, and rabies license tags. The examination for 23identification shall be done within 24 hours after the intake   HB2410- 2 -LRB104 08646 BDA 18699 b1of each dog or cat. The animal shelter shall notify the owner 2and transfer any dog with an identified owner to the animal 3control or law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which 4it was found or the local animal control agency for 5redemption.6    (c) If no transfer can occur, the animal shelter shall 7make every reasonable attempt to contact the owner, agent, or 8caretaker as soon as possible. The animal shelter shall give 9notice of not less than 7 business days to the owner, agent, or 10caretaker prior to disposal of the animal. The notice shall be 11mailed to the last known address of the owner, agent, or 12caretaker. Testimony of the animal shelter, or its authorized 13agent, who mails the notice shall be evidence of the receipt of 14the notice by the owner, agent, or caretaker of the animal. A 15mailed notice shall remain the primary means of owner, agent, 16or caretaker contact; however, the animal shelter shall also 17attempt to contact the owner, agent, or caretaker by any other 18contact information, such as by telephone or email address, 19provided by the microchip or other method of identification 20found on the dog or cat. If the dog or cat has been 21microchipped and the primary contact listed by the chip 22manufacturer cannot be located or refuses to reclaim the dog 23or cat, an attempt shall be made to contact any secondary 24contacts listed by the chip manufacturer or the purchaser of 25the microchip if the purchaser is a nonprofit organization, 26animal shelter, animal control facility, pet store, breeder,   HB2410- 3 -LRB104 08646 BDA 18699 b1or veterinary office prior to adoption, transfer, or 2euthanization. Prior to transferring any stray dog or cat to 3another humane shelter, pet store, rescue group, or 4euthanization, the dog or cat shall be scanned again for the 5presence of a microchip and examined for other means of 6identification. If a second scan provides the same identifying 7information as the initial intake scan and the owner, agent, 8or caretaker has not been located or refuses to reclaim the dog 9or cat, the animal shelter may proceed with adoption, 10transfer, or euthanization.11    (d) When stray dogs and cats are accepted by an animal 12shelter and no owner can be identified, the shelter shall hold 13the animal for the period specified in local ordinance prior 14to adoption, transfer, or euthanasia. The animal shelter shall 15allow access to the public to view the animals housed there. If 16a dog is identified by an owner who desires to make redemption 17of it, the dog shall be transferred to the local animal control 18for redemption. If no transfer can occur, the animal shelter 19shall proceed pursuant to Section 3.7. Upon lapse of the hold 20period specified in local ordinance and no owner can be 21identified, ownership of the animal, by operation of law, 22transfers to the shelter that has custody of the animal.23    (e) No representative of an animal shelter may enter 24private property and remove an animal without permission from 25the property owner and animal owner, nor can any 26representative of an animal shelter direct another individual   HB2410- 4 -LRB104 08646 BDA 18699 b1to enter private property and remove an animal unless that 2individual is an approved humane investigator (approved by the 3Department) operating pursuant to the provisions of the Humane 4Care for Animals Act.5    (f) Nothing in this Section limits an animal shelter and 6an animal control facility who, through mutual agreement, wish 7to enter into an agreement for animal control, boarding, 8holding, measures to improve life-saving, or other services 9provided that the agreement requires parties adhere to the 10provisions of the Animal Control Act, the Humane Euthanasia in 11Animal Shelters Act, and the Humane Care for Animals Act.12    (g) Nothing in this Act permits the euthanization of a 13dog, cat, or other pet in an animal shelter except in 14accordance with the requirements under Section 57 of the 15Humane Euthanasia in Animal Shelters Act.16(Source: P.A. 99-310, eff. 1-1-16; 100-322, eff. 8-24-17; 17100-870, eff. 1-1-19.) 18    Section 10. The Humane Care for Animals Act is amended by 19changing Section 2.09 as follows: 20    (510 ILCS 70/2.09)21    Sec. 2.09. Humanely euthanized. "Humanely euthanized" 22means the painless administration of a lethal dose of an agent 23or method of euthanasia as prescribed in the Report of the 24American Veterinary Medical Association Panel on Euthanasia   HB2410- 5 -LRB104 08646 BDA 18699 b1published in the Journal of the American Veterinary Medical 2Association, March 1, 2001 (or any successor version of that 3Report), that causes the painless death of an animal, except 4as provided in this definition. Animals must be handled prior 5to administration of the agent or method of euthanasia in a 6manner to avoid undue apprehension by the animal. "Humanely 7euthanized" does not include euthanization of a dog, cat, or 8other pet in an animal shelter for any reason other than health 9reasons, attitude issues, or aggressiveness. 10(Source: P.A. 92-454, eff. 1-1-02.) 11    Section 15. The Humane Euthanasia in Animal Shelters Act 12is amended by changing Section 57 as follows: 13    (510 ILCS 72/57)14    Sec. 57. Procedures for euthanasia. 15    (a) Only euthanasia drugs shall be used for the purpose of 16humanely euthanizing injured, sick, homeless, or unwanted 17companion animals in an animal shelter or an animal control 18facility licensed under the Illinois Animal Welfare Act, 19except that a licensed veterinarian may euthanize companion 20animals in such a shelter or facility by the use of carbon 21monoxide if the veterinarian complies with the requirements 22set forth in Section 3.09 of the Humane Care for Animals Act. 23Euthanasia by a certified euthanasia technician shall be 24conducted only within the physical premises of an animal   HB2410- 6 -LRB104 08646 BDA 18699 b1shelter licensed under the Animal Welfare Act or an animal 2control facility licensed under the Animal Welfare Act, except 3that a certified euthanasia technician employed by an animal 4control facility licensed under the Animal Welfare Act may 5euthanize animals in the field in emergency situations. 6Notwithstanding any other provision of any law, no person may 7euthanize a cat, dog, or other pet in an animal shelter unless 8the euthanization is for health reasons, attitude issues, or 9aggressiveness. 10    (b) (Blank). 11    (c) Animals cannot be transported beyond State lines for 12the sole purpose of euthanasia unless the euthanasia is 13performed by a licensed veterinarian in a manner that is 14consistent with subsection (a) of this Section. 15(Source: P.A. 96-780, eff. 8-28-09.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 171, 2026.